District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-926

Transfer of shares and memberships; withdrawal.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 485, ch. 397, § 26
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-926.
1981 Ed., § 29-1126.
1973 Ed., § 29-826.